hu: Tok anyaga: Kompozit; Szövet; Műbőr; Bőr; Fém; Műanyag; Gyanta; Fa; Egyéb
en: Scabbard material: Composite; Fabric; Faux leather; Leather; Metal; Plastic; Resin; Wood; Other
pl: Materiał pochwy: Kompozyt; Materiał; Sztuczna skóra; Skóra; Metal; Plastik; Żywica; Drewno; Inny
pt-BR: Bainha material: Compósito; Tecido; Couro sintético; Couro; Metal; Plástico; Resina; Madeira; Outros
sv: Balja/slida – material: Komposit; Tyg; Konstläder; Läder; Metall; Plast; Harts; Trä; Övrigt
el: Υλικό θηκαριού: Σύνθετο υλικό; Ύφασμα; Συνθετικό δέρμα; Δέρμα; Μέταλλο; Πλαστικό; Ρητίνη; Ξύλο; Άλλο
nl: Schede materiaal: Composiet; Stof; Kunstleer; Leer; Metaal; Plastic; Hars; Hout; Overige
sl-SI: Material nožnice: Kompozit; Tkanina; Umetno usnje; Usnje; Kovina; Plastika; Smola; Les; Drugo
hr-HR: Materijal korica: Kompozitni materijal; Tkanina; Umjetna koža; Koža; Metal; Plastika; Smola; Drvo; Ostalo
cs: Materiál pochvy: Kompozit; Látka; Umělá kůže; Kůže; Kov; Plast; Pryskyřice; Dřevo; Jiné
zh-TW: 刀鞘材質: 複合材質; 布料; 人造皮革; 皮革; 金屬; 塑膠; 樹脂; 木材; 其他
de: Material der Scheide: Verbundstoff; Stoff; Kunstleder; Leder; Metall; Kunststoff; Harz; Holz; Sonstige
zh-CN: 刀鞘/剑鞘材质: 复合材料; 面料; 人造皮革; 皮革; 金属; 塑料; 树脂; 木材; 其他
it: Materiale del fodero: Composito; Tessuto; Ecopelle; Pelle; Metallo; Plastica; Resina; Legno; Altro
da: Skedemateriale: Komposit; Stof; Kunstlæder; Læder; Metal; Plastik; Harpiks; Træ; Andet
es: Material de la vaina: Material compuesto; Tela; Piel sintética; Cuero; Metal; Plástico; Resina; Madera; Otro
vi: Vật liệu vỏ kiếm: Composite; Vải; Giả da; Da; Kim loại; Nhựa; Nhựa thông; Gỗ; Khác
ro-RO: Materialul tecii: Compozit; Material textil; Piele ecologică; Piele; Metal; Plastic; Rășină; Lemn; Altele
ja: 鞘の素材: コンポジット; ファブリック; フェイクレザー; レザー; 金属; プラスチック; 樹脂; 木材; その他
tr: Kılıf malzemesi: Kompozit; Kumaş; Suni deri; Deri; Metal; Plastik; Reçine; Ahşap; Diğer
bg-BG: Материал на канията: Композит; Тъкан; Изкуствена кожа; Естествена кожа; Метал; Пластмаса; Смола; Дърво; Друго
th: วัสดุฝักดาบ: คอมโพสิต; ผ้า; หนังเทียม; หนัง; โลหะ; พลาสติก; เรซิน; ไม้; อื่นๆ
fi: Tupen materiaali: Komposiitti; Kangas; Tekonahka; Nahka; Metalli; Muovi; Hartsi; Puu; Muu
sk-SK: Materiál puzdra: Kompozit; Látka; Umelá koža; Koža; Kov; Plast; Živica; Drevo; Iné
fr: Matériau du fourreau: Composite; Tissu; Faux cuir; Cuir; Métal; Plastique; Résine; Bois; Autre
lt-LT: Makšties medžiaga: Kompozitas; Audinys; Dirbtinė oda; Oda; Metalas; Plastikas; Derva; Mediena; Kita
pt-PT: Material da caixa: Composto; Tecido; Pele sintética; Pele; Metal; Plástico; Resina; Madeira; Outro
ru: Материал ножен: Композит; Ткань; Искусственная кожа; Кожа; Металл; Пластик; Смола; Дерево; Другое
ko: 칼집 소재: 복합재; 패브릭; 인조 가죽; 가죽; 금속; 플라스틱; 수지; 목재; 기타
nb: Sliremateriale: Kompositt; Stoff; Kunstskinn; Skinn; Metall; Plast; Harpiks; Tre; Annet